Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.42.070

Abandonment of a dependent person in the second degree—Exception.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a person is guilty of the crime of abandonment of a dependent person in the second degree if:

(a) The person is the parent of a child, a person entrusted with the physical custody of a child or other dependent person, a person who has assumed the responsibility to provide to a dependent person the basic necessities of life, or a person employed to provide to the child or other dependent person any of the basic necessities of life; and

(b) The person recklessly abandons the child or other dependent person; and:

(i) As a result of being abandoned, the child or other dependent person suffers substantial bodily harm; or

(ii) Abandoning the child or other dependent person creates an imminent and substantial risk that the child or other dependent person will die or suffer great bodily harm.

(2) A parent of a newborn who transfers the newborn to a qualified person at an appropriate location pursuant to RCW 13.34.360 is not subject to criminal liability under this section.

(3) Abandonment of a dependent person in the second degree is a class C felony.

[ 2006 c 228 s 7; 2002 c 331 s 4; 1996 c 302 s 3.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2002 c 331: See notes following RCW 13.34.360.

Severability—1996 c 302: See note following RCW 9A.42.010.